District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.31

Signs identifying the District as a strict enforcement zone.

Within 180 days of May 1, 2013, the Mayor shall post signs identifying the entire District as a strict traffic enforcement zone and warning that automated cameras are used to enforce a wide range of moving violations. The signs shall be posted throughout the District, in locations as determined by the Mayor to be necessary or appropriate.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-307, § 102, 60 DCR 2753
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 102 of the Safety-Based Traffic Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-50, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6339, 20 DCSTAT 1356).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-307: Section 401(a) of D.C. Law 19-307 provided that this section shall apply as of May 1, 2013.